Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.09
Grant funds; prohibited use.

A qualified nonprofit organization shall not use grant funds to purchase equipment for security personnel.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 17.
July 19, 2024